California statutes. Penal Code
(a) The county agency responsible for postrelease supervision, as established by the county board of supervisors pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 3451, shall maintain postrelease supervision over a person under postrelease supervision pursuant to this title until one of the following events occurs:

(1) The person has been subject to postrelease supervision pursuant to this title for three years at which time the offender shall be immediately discharged from postrelease supervision.

(2) Any person on postrelease supervision for six consecutive months with no violations of his or her conditions of postrelease supervision that result in a custodial sanction
 may be considered for immediate discharge by the supervising county.

(3) The person who has been on postrelease supervision continuously for one year with no violations of his or her conditions of postrelease supervision that result in a custodial sanction shall be discharged from supervision within 30 days.

(4) Jurisdiction over the person has been terminated by operation of law.

(5) Jurisdiction is transferred to another supervising county agency.

(6) Jurisdiction is terminated by the revocation hearing officer upon a petition to revoke and terminate supervision by the supervising county agency.

(b) Time during which a person on postrelease supervision is suspended because the person has
 absconded shall not be credited toward any period of postrelease supervision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 12, Sec. 31.   (AB 17 1x)   Effective September 21, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 46 of Ch. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

3456.5.

(a) (1) The local supervising agency, in coordination with the sheriff or local correctional administrator, may require any person that is to be released from county jail or a local correctional facility into postrelease community supervision to report to a supervising agent or designated local supervising agency within two days of release from the county jail or local correction facility.

(2) This section shall not prohibit the local supervising agency from requiring any person released on postrelease community supervision to report to his or her assigned supervising agent within a time period that is less than two days from the time of release.

(b) With regard to any inmate subject to this section, the sheriff or local correctional administrator may release an inmate sentenced prior to the effective date of the act adding this section one or two days before his or her scheduled release date if the inmate’s release date falls on the day before a holiday or weekend.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 53.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

3457.

The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall have no jurisdiction over any person who is under postrelease community supervision pursuant to this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 479.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

3458.

No person subject to this title shall be returned to prison for a violation of any condition of the person’s postrelease supervision agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 479.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

3460.

(a) Whenever a supervising agency determines that a person subject to postrelease supervision pursuant to this chapter no longer permanently resides within its jurisdiction, and a change in residence was either approved by the supervising agency or did not violate the terms and conditions of postrelease supervision, the supervising agency shall transmit, within two weeks, any information the agency received from the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation prior to the release of the person in that jurisdiction to the designated supervising agency in the county in which the person permanently resides.

(b) Upon verification of permanent residency, the receiving supervising agency shall accept
 jurisdiction and supervision of the person on postrelease supervision.

(c) For purposes of this section, residence means the place where the person customarily lives exclusive of employment, school, or other special or temporary purpose. A person may have only one residence.

(d) No supervising agency shall be required to transfer jurisdiction to another county unless the person demonstrates an ability to establish permanent residency within another county without violating the terms and conditions of postrelease supervision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 12, Sec. 32.   (AB 17 1x)   Effective September 21, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 46 of Ch. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

3465.

Every person placed on postrelease community supervision, and his or her residence and possessions, shall be subject to search or seizure at any time of the day or night, with or without a warrant, by an agent of the supervising county agency or by a peace officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 12, Sec. 33.   (AB 17 1x)   Effective September 21, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 46 of Ch. 12.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 2.1. BIOMEDICAL AND BEHAVIORIAL RESEARCH [3500. - 3524.]



  CHAPTER 1. Definitions [3500. - 3500.]

3500.

For purposes of this title:

(a) “Behavioral research” means studies involving, but not limited to, the investigation of human behavior, emotion, adaptation, conditioning, and response in a program designed to test certain hypotheses through the collection of objective data. Behavioral research does not include the accumulation of statistical data in the assessment of the effectiveness of programs to which inmates are routinely assigned, including, but not limited to, education, vocational training, productive work, counseling, recognized therapies, and programs that are not experimental in nature.

(b) “Biomedical research” means research relating to or involving biological, medical, or physical science. Biomedical research does not include the accumulation of statistical data in the assessment of the effectiveness of nonexperimental public health programs or treatment programs in which inmates routinely participate.

(c) “Psychotropic drug” means a drug that has the capability of changing or controlling mental functioning or behavior through direct pharmacological action. These drugs include, but are not limited to, antipsychotic, antianxiety, sedative, antidepressant, and stimulant drugs. Psychotropic drugs also include mind-altering and behavior-altering drugs that, in specified dosages, are used to alleviate certain physical disorders, and drugs that
 are ordinarily used to alleviate certain physical disorders but may, in specified dosages, have mind-altering or behavior-altering effects.

(d) “Research” means a class of activities designed to develop or contribute to generalizable knowledge, including theories, principles, or relationships, or the accumulation of data on which they may be based, that can be corroborated by accepted scientific observation and inferences.

(e) “Research protocol” means a formal document setting forth the explicit objectives of a research project and the procedures of investigation designed to reach those objectives.

(f) “Phase I drug” means a drug that is designated as a phase I drug for testing purposes under the federal
 Food and Drug Administration criteria in Part 312 of Subchapter D of Chapter I of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 197, Sec. 1.   (SB 1238)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. General Provisions and Prohibitions [3501. - 3509.5.]

3501.

The Legislature affirms the fundamental right of competent adults to make decisions about their participation in behavioral research.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1553, Sec. 1.5.)
-------------------------------------------

3502.

(a) Biomedical research shall not be conducted on any prisoner in this state.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), records-based biomedical research using existing information, without prospective interaction with human subjects, may be conducted consistent with this title. The use or disclosure of individually identifiable records pursuant to this subdivision shall only occur after both of the following requirements have been met:

(1) The research advisory committee established
 pursuant to Section 3369.5 of Title 15 of the California Code of Regulations approves of the use or disclosure.

(2) The prisoner provides written authorization for the use or disclosure, or the use or disclosure is permitted by Section 164.512 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 197, Sec. 2.   (SB 1238)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

3502.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 3502, any physician who provides medical care to prisoners may provide a patient who is a prisoner with a drug or treatment available only through a treatment protocol or treatment IND (investigational new drug), as defined in Section 312 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations, if the physician determines that access to that drug is in the best medical interest of the patient, and the patient has given informed consent under Section 3521.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, neither a public entity nor a public employee shall be liable for any injury caused by the administration of a drug pursuant to subdivision (a), where the administration is made in accordance with a treatment IND or a treatment protocol as defined in Section 312 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 70, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

3504.

Any physical or mental injury of a prisoner resulting from the participation in behavioral research, irrespective of causation of such injury, shall be treated promptly and on a continuing basis until the injury is cured.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1553, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

3505.

Behavioral research shall be limited to studies of the possible causes, effects and processes of incarceration and studies of prisons as institutional structures or of prisoners as incarcerated persons which present minimal or no risk and no more than mere inconvenience to the subjects of the research. Informed consent shall not be required for participation in behavioral research when the department determines that it would be unnecessary or significantly inhibit the conduct of such research. In the absence of such determination, informed consent shall be required for participation in behavioral research.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1553, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

3508.

Behavioral modification techniques shall be used only if such techniques are medically and socially acceptable means by which to modify behavior and if such techniques do not inflict permanent physical or psychological injury.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------

3509.5.

Nothing in this title is intended to diminish the authority of any official or agency to adopt and enforce rules pertaining to prisoners, so long as such rules are not inconsistent with this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Administration [3515. - 3520.]

3515.

The duties of the department are to determine:

(a) That the risks to the prisoners consenting to research are outweighed by the sum of benefits to the prisoners and the importance of the knowledge to be gained.

(b) That the rights and welfare of the prisoners are adequately protected, including the security of any confidential personal information.

(c) That the procedures for selection of prisoners are equitable and that subjects are not unjustly deprived of the opportunity to participate.

(d) That adequate provisions have been made for compensating research related injury.

(e) That the rate of remuneration is comparable to that received by nonprisoner volunteers in similar research.

(f) That the conduct of the activity will be reviewed at timely intervals.

(g) That legally effective informed consent will be obtained by adequate and appropriate methods.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1553, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

3516.

No behavioral research shall be conducted on any prisoner in this state in the absence of a determination by the department consistent with this title.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1553, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

3517.

The department shall promulgate rules and regulations reasonably necessary for the effective administration of the provisions of this title. Action on proposals submitted shall be taken within 60 days. The regulations shall be submitted to the Joint Legislative Prison Committee for review and shall not become operative until 60 days after submission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1553, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

3518.

The department shall promulgate rules and regulations prescribing procedures to be followed by any person who has a grievance concerning the operation of any particular research program conducted pursuant to this title.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1553, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

3519.

The department shall evaluate the impact of research on human subjects approved and conducted pursuant to this title, including any adverse reactions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1553, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

3520.

The department shall make a report due on or before January 1 of each odd-numbered year containing a review of each research program which has been approved and conducted. The report shall be transmitted to the Legislature and shall be made available to the public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 468, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Prisoners’ Rights as Research Subjects [3521. - 3523.]

3521.

For the purposes of this title, a prisoner shall be deemed to have given his informed consent only if each of the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) Consent is given without duress, coercion, fraud, or undue influence.

(b) The prisoner is informed in writing of the potential risks or benefits, or both, of the proposed research.

(c) The prisoner is informed orally and in writing in the language in which the subject is fluent of each of the following:

(1) An explanation of the biomedical or behavioral research procedures to be followed and their purposes, including identification of any procedures which are experimental.

(2) A description of all known attendant discomfort and risks reasonably to be expected.

(3) A disclosure of any appropriate alternative biomedical or behavioral research procedures that might be advantageous for the subject.

(4) The nature of the information sought to be gained by the experiment.

(5) The expected recovery time of the subject after completion of the experiment.

(6) An offer to answer any inquiries concerning the applicable biomedical or behavioral research procedures.

(7) An instruction that the person is free to withdraw his consent and to discontinue participation in the research at any time without prejudice to the subject.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------

3522.

At the time of furnishing a prisoner the writing required by subdivision (b) of Section 3521, the prisoner shall also be given information as to (a) the amount of remuneration the prisoner will receive for the research and (b) the manner in which the prisoner may obtain prompt treatment for any research-related injuries. Such information shall be provided in writing on a form to be retained by the prisoner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------

3523.

The amount of such remuneration shall be comparable to that which is paid to nonprisoner volunteers in similar research.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Remedies [3524. - 3524.]

3524.

(a) A prisoner may maintain an action for injury to such prisoner, including physical or mental injury, or both, caused by the wrongful or negligent act of a person during the course of the prisoner’s participation in biomedical or behavioral research conducted pursuant to this title.

(b) In any action pursuant to this section, such damages may be awarded as under all of the circumstances of the case may be just.

(c) When the death of a prisoner is caused by the wrongful act or neglect of another, his or her heirs or personal representatives on their behalf may maintain an action for damages against the person causing the death, or if dead, such person’s personal representatives.

(d) If an action arising out of the same wrongful act or neglect may be maintained pursuant to subdivision (c) for wrongful death to any such prisoner, the action authorized by subdivision (a) shall be consolidated therewith for trial on motion of any interested party.

(e) For the purposes of this section, “heirs” mean only the following:

(1) Those persons who would be entitled to succeed to the property of the decedent according to the provisions of Part 2 (commencing with Section 6400) of Division 6 of the Probate Code, and

(2) Whether or not qualified under paragraph (1), if they were dependent on the decedent, the putative spouse, children of the putative spouse, stepchildren, and parents. As used in this paragraph, “putative spouse” means the surviving spouse of a void or voidable marriage who is found by the court to have believed in good faith that the marriage to the decedent was valid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 842, Sec. 16.   Operative January 1, 1985, by Sec. 58 of Ch. 842.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 2.3. MEDICAL PAROLE [3550. - 3550.]

3550.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, except as provided in subdivision (b), if the head physician of an institution in which a prisoner is incarcerated determines, as provided in this section, that the prisoner is permanently medically incapacitated with a medical condition that renders him or her permanently unable to perform activities of basic daily living, and results in the prisoner requiring 24-hour care, and that incapacitation did not exist at the time of sentencing, the prisoner shall be granted medical parole if the Board of Parole Hearings determines that the conditions under which he or she would be released would not reasonably pose a threat to public safety.

(b) This
 section does not alter or diminish the rights conferred under the Victims’ Bill of Rights Act of 2008 (Marsy’s Law). Subdivision (a) does not apply to any of the following:

(1) A prisoner sentenced to death or life in prison without possibility of parole.

(2) A prisoner who is serving a sentence for which parole, pursuant to subdivision (a), is prohibited by any initiative statute.

(3) A prisoner who was convicted of first-degree murder if the victim was a peace officer, as defined in Section 830.1, 830.2, 830.3, 830.31, 830.32, 830.33, 830.34, 830.35, 830.36, 830.37, 830.4, 830.5, 830.6, 830.10, 830.11, or 830.12, who was killed while engaged in the performance of his or her duties, and the individual knew, or reasonably
 should have known, that the victim was a peace officer engaged in the performance of his or her duties, or the victim was a peace officer or a former peace officer under any of the above-enumerated sections, and was intentionally killed in retaliation for the performance of his or her official duties.

(c) When a physician employed by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation who is the primary care provider for a prisoner identifies a prisoner that he or she believes meets the medical criteria for medical parole specified in subdivision (a), the primary care physician shall recommend to the head physician of the institution where the prisoner is located that the prisoner be referred to the Board of Parole Hearings for consideration for medical parole. Within 30 days of receiving that recommendation, if the head physician of the
 institution concurs in the recommendation of the primary care physician, he or she shall refer the matter to the Board of Parole Hearings using a standardized form and format developed by the department, and if the head physician of the institution does not concur in the recommendation, he or she shall provide the primary care physician with a written explanation of the reasons for denying the referral.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, the prisoner or his or her family member or designee may independently request consideration for medical parole by contacting the head physician at the prison or the department. Within 30 days of receiving the request, the head physician of the institution shall, in consultation with the prisoner’s primary care physician, make a determination regarding whether the prisoner meets
 the criteria for medical parole as specified in subdivision (a) and, if the head physician of the institution determines that the prisoner satisfies the criteria set forth in subdivision (a), he or she shall refer the matter to the Board of Parole Hearings using a standardized form and format developed by the department. If the head physician of the institution does not concur in the recommendation, he or she shall provide the prisoner or his or her family member or designee with a written explanation of the reasons for denying the application.

(e) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall complete parole plans for inmates referred to the Board of Parole Hearings for medical parole consideration. The parole plans shall include, but not be limited to, the inmate’s plan for residency and medical care.

(f) Notwithstanding any other law, medical parole hearings shall be conducted by two-person panels consisting of at least one commissioner. In the event of a tie vote, the matter shall be referred to the full board for a decision. Medical parole hearings may be heard in absentia.

(g) Upon receiving a recommendation from the head physician of the institution where a prisoner is located for the prisoner to be granted medical parole pursuant to subdivision (c) or (d), the board, as specified in subdivision (f), shall make an independent judgment regarding whether the conditions under which the inmate would be released pose a reasonable threat to public safety, and make written findings related thereto.

(h) Notwithstanding any other law, the board or the Division of Adult Parole Operations shall have the authority to impose any reasonable conditions on prisoners subject to medical parole supervision pursuant to subdivision (a), including, but not limited to, the requirement that the parolee submit to electronic monitoring. As a further condition of medical parole, pursuant to subdivision (a), the parolee may be required to submit to an examination by a physician selected by the board for the purpose of diagnosing the parolee’s current medical condition. In the event such an examination takes place, a report of the examination and diagnosis shall be submitted to the board by the examining physician. If the board determines, based on that medical examination, that the person’s medical condition has improved to the extent that the person no longer qualifies for medical parole, the
 board shall return the person to the custody of the department.

(1) Notwithstanding any other law establishing maximum periods for parole, a prisoner sentenced to a determinate term who is placed on medical parole supervision prior to the earliest possible release date and who remains eligible for medical parole, shall remain on medical parole, pursuant to subdivision (a), until that earliest possible release date, at which time the parolee shall commence serving that period of parole provided by, and under the provisions of, Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 3000) of Title 1.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law establishing maximum periods for parole, a prisoner sentenced to an indeterminate term who is placed on medical parole supervision prior to the prisoner’s minimum eligible
 parole date, and who remains eligible for medical parole, shall remain on medical parole pursuant to subdivision (a) until that minimum eligible parole date, at which time the parolee shall be eligible for parole consideration under all other provisions of Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 3000) of Title 1.

(i) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall, at the time a prisoner is placed on medical parole supervision pursuant to subdivision (a), ensure that the prisoner has applied for any federal entitlement programs for which the prisoner is eligible, and has in his or her possession a discharge medical summary, full medical records, parole medications, and all property belonging to the prisoner that was under the control of the department. Any additional records shall be sent to the prisoner’s forwarding address after
 release to health care-related parole supervision.

(j) The provisions for medical parole set forth in this title shall not affect an inmate’s eligibility for any other form of parole or release provided by law.

(k) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall give notice to the county of commitment and the proposed county of release, if that county is different than the county of commitment, of any medical parole hearing as described in subdivision (f), and of any medical parole release as described in subdivision (g).

(2) Notice shall be made at least 30 days, or as soon as feasible, prior to the time any medical parole hearing or medical parole release
 is scheduled for an inmate receiving medical parole consideration, regardless of whether the inmate is sentenced either determinately or indeterminately.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 886, Sec. 2.   (SB 6)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 3. EXECUTION OF DEATH PENALTY [3600. - 3706.]



  CHAPTER 1. Executing Death Penalty [3600. - 3607.]

3600.

Every male person, upon whom has been imposed the judgment of death, shall be delivered to the warden of the California state prison designated by the department for the execution of the death penalty. The inmate shall be kept in a California prison until execution of the judgment. The department may transfer the inmate to another prison which it determines to provide a level of security sufficient for that inmate. The inmate shall be returned to the prison designated for execution of the death penalty after an execution date has been set.

(History: Amended November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 66, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

3601.

Every female person, upon whom has been imposed the judgment of death, shall be delivered to the warden of the Central California Women’s Facility, there to be held pending decision upon appeal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1016, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3602.

Upon the affirmance of her appeal, the female person sentenced to death shall thereafter be delivered to the warden of the California state prison designated by the department for the execution of the death penalty, not earlier than three days before the day upon which judgment is to be executed; provided, however, that in the event of a commutation of sentence said female prisoner shall be returned to the Central California Women’s Facility, there to be confined pursuant to such commutation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 279, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

3603.

The judgment of death shall be executed within the walls of the California State Prison at San Quentin.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 558, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

3604.

(a) The punishment of death shall be inflicted by the administration of a lethal gas or by an intravenous injection of a substance or substances in a lethal quantity sufficient to cause death, by standards established under the direction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(b) Persons sentenced to death prior to or after the operative date of this subdivision shall have the opportunity to elect to have the punishment imposed by lethal gas or lethal injection. This choice shall be made in writing and shall be submitted to the warden pursuant to regulations established by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation. If a person under sentence of death does not choose either lethal gas or lethal injection within 10 days after the warden’s service upon the inmate of an execution warrant issued following the operative date of
 this subdivision, the penalty of death shall be imposed by lethal injection.

(c) Where the person sentenced to death is not executed on the date set for execution and a new execution date is subsequently set, the inmate again shall have the opportunity to elect to have punishment imposed by lethal gas or lethal injection, according to the procedures set forth in subdivision (b).

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), if either manner of execution described in subdivision (a) is held invalid, the punishment of death shall be imposed by the alternative means specified in subdivision (a).

(e) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, or any successor agency with the duty to execute judgments of death, shall maintain at all times the ability to execute such judgments.

(History: Amended November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 66, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

3604.1.

(a) The Administrative Procedure Act shall not apply to standards, procedures, or regulations promulgated pursuant to Section 3604. The department shall make the standards adopted under subdivision (a) of that section available to the public and to inmates sentenced to death. The department shall promptly notify the Attorney General, the State Public Defender, and counsel for any inmate for whom an execution date has been set or for whom a motion to set an execution date is pending of any adoption or amendment of the standards. Noncompliance with this subdivision is not a ground for stay of an execution or an injunction against carrying out an execution unless the noncompliance has actually prejudiced the inmate’s ability to challenge the standard, and in that event the stay shall be limited to a maximum of 10 days.

(b) Notwithstanding
 subdivision (a) of Section 3604, an execution by lethal injection may be carried out by means of an injection other than intravenous if the warden determines that the condition of the inmate makes intravenous injection impractical.

(c) The court which rendered the judgment of death has exclusive jurisdiction to hear any claim by the condemned inmate that the method of execution is unconstitutional or otherwise invalid. Such a claim shall be dismissed if the court finds its presentation was delayed without good cause. If the method is found invalid, the court shall order the use of a valid method of execution. If the use of a method of execution is enjoined by a federal court, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall adopt, within 90 days, a method that conforms to federal requirements as found by that court. If the department fails to perform any duty needed to enable it to execute the judgment, the court which rendered the judgment of death shall order it to perform
 that duty on its own motion, on motion of the District Attorney or Attorney General, or on motion of any victim of the crime as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 28 of Article I of the California Constitution.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 66, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

3604.3.

(a) A physician may attend an execution for the purpose of pronouncing death and may provide advice to the department for the purpose of developing an execution protocol to minimize the risk of pain to the inmate.

(b) The purchase of drugs, medical supplies or medical equipment necessary to carry out an execution shall not be subject to the provisions of Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 4000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, and any pharmacist, or supplier, compounder, or manufacturer of pharmaceuticals is authorized to dispense drugs and supplies to the secretary or the secretary’s designee, without prescription, for carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

(c) No licensing board, department, commission, or accreditation agency that oversees or regulates the practice of health care or
 certifies or licenses health care professionals may deny or revoke a license or certification, censure, reprimand, suspend, or take any other disciplinary action against any licensed health care professional for any action authorized by this section.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 66, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

3605.

(a) The warden of the state prison where the execution is to take place shall be present at the execution and shall, subject to any applicable requirement or definition set forth in subdivision (b), invite the presence of the Attorney General, the members of the immediate family of the victim or victims of the defendant, and at least 12 reputable citizens, to be selected by the warden. The warden shall, at the request of the defendant, permit those ministers of the Gospel, not exceeding two, as the defendant may name, and any persons, relatives or friends, not to exceed five, to be present at the execution, together with those peace officers or any other Department of Corrections employee as he or she may think expedient, to witness the execution. But no other persons than those specified in this section may be present at the execution, nor may any person under 18 years of age be allowed to witness the execution.

(b) (1) For purposes of an invitation required by subdivision (a) to members of the immediate family of the victim or victims of the defendant, the warden of the state prison where the execution is to take place shall make the invitation only if a member of the immediate family of the victim or victims of the defendant so requests in writing. In the event that a written request is made, the warden of the state prison where the execution is to take place shall automatically make the invitation 30 days prior to the date of an imminent execution or as close to this date as practicable.

(2) For purposes of this section, “immediate family” means those persons who are related by blood, adoption, or marriage, within the second degree of consanguinity or affinity.

(c) No physician or any other person invited pursuant to this section, whether or not employed by the Department of Corrections, shall be compelled to attend the execution, and any physician’s attendance shall be voluntary. A physician’s or any other person’s refusal to attend the execution shall not be used in any disciplinary action or negative job performance citation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 71, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

3607.

After the execution, the warden must make a return upon the death warrant to the clerk of the court by which the judgment was rendered, showing the time, mode, and manner in which it was executed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 561.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Suspension of Execution of Death Penalty: Insanity: Pregnancy [3700. - 3706.]

3700.

When a court enters an order appointing a day upon which a judgment of death shall be executed upon an incarcerated person, the warden of the state prison to whom the incarcerated person has been delivered for execution or, if the incarcerated person is housed at the Central California Women’s Facility, the warden of that facility, shall notify the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation who shall then select and appoint three psychiatrists or licensed psychologists, all of whom must be from the medical staffs of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to examine the incarcerated person under the judgment of death, and investigate the incarcerated person’s competence to be executed. It is the duty
 of the psychiatrists or licensed psychologists so selected and appointed to examine the incarcerated person and investigate the incarcerated person’s competence to be executed, and to report their opinions and conclusions in writing to the warden of the prison at which the execution is to take place, or, if the incarcerated person is housed there, the warden of the Central California Women’s Facility, at least 20 days prior to the day appointed for the execution of the judgment of death upon the incarcerated person. Upon receipt, the warden shall serve a copy of the report to counsel for the
 incarcerated person, to the Attorney General, to the district attorney of the county in which the person was sentenced, and to the Governor.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 3700.5 by Stats. 2022, Ch. 795, Sec. 3.   (AB 2657)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

3701.

(a) If, after an execution date has been set, there is good reason to believe that an incarcerated person under judgment of death has become incompetent to be executed, the warden shall call that fact to the attention of the district attorney of the county in which the incarcerated person was sentenced, the Attorney General, and the incarcerated person’s counsel. If counsel for the incarcerated person has reason to believe that the incarcerated person is incompetent to be executed, counsel for the incarcerated person has a duty to file within 48 hours
 in the superior court of the county from which the incarcerated person’s judgment and sentence of death arises, a petition that identifies the conviction and judgment, alleges that the incarcerated person is believed to be incompetent to be executed, and asks that the question of the incarcerated person’s competence to be executed be inquired into. If counsel for the incarcerated person does not file that petition, or the incarcerated person does not have counsel, and the warden has notified the district attorney and the Attorney General that there is reason to believe that the incarcerated person is incompetent to be executed, the Attorney General shall file the petition. During the course of these proceedings, the court shall also consider whether the petitioner is permanently incompetent to be executed within the meaning of subdivision (e). The incarcerated person’s execution may
 not proceed until the court’s inquiry into the incarcerated person’s competence to be executed is complete.
